Nebraska, session 109, LB259.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB259 LB259
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 11 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Faithful Delegate to Federal Article V Convention Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Faithful Delegate to Federal Article V
Convention Act:
(1) Alternate delegate means a member of the Legislature elected as
provided in section 4 of this act to represent this state as an alternate
delegate at an Article V convention;
(2) Article V convention means a convention called by the United
States Congress under Article V of the Constitution of the United States;
(3) Delegate means:
(a) A member of the Legislature elected as provided in section 4 of
this act to represent this state as a delegate at an Article V
convention; and
(b) An alternate delegate who fills a vacancy created by the removal
of a delegate or acts in place of the delegate in such delegate's absence
or incapacity;
(4) Legislative caucus means a group of legislative districts from
which members are elected to the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council as designated in subsection (1) of section 50-401.01; and
(5) Unauthorized vote means a vote by a delegate at an Article V
convention that:
(a) Is contrary to the instructions adopted by the Legislature in
effect at the time the vote is taken;
(b) Exceeds the scope of the subject matter of the Article V
convention authorized by the Legislature in the application to the United
States Congress to call the convention if the Legislature made an
application to call the convention; or
(c) Exceeds the scope or subject matter of the Article V convention
if the Legislature did not make an application to the United States
Congress to call the convention.
Sec. 3. The purpose of the Faithful Delegate to Federal Article V
-2-

LB259 LB259
2025 2025
Convention Act is to provide the rules and procedures necessary to create
and guide a delegation to an Article V convention and provide legislative
direction relating to the election or recall of a delegate or an
alternate delegate, the filling of a vacancy of a delegate or an
alternate delegate, and the determination of an unauthorized vote.
Sec. 4. (1) As soon as possible following the calling of an Article
V convention, the Legislature shall elect delegates and alternate
delegates as provided in this section.
(2) The Committee on Committees of the Legislature shall, by
majority vote of all committee members, nominate one delegate and one
alternate delegate from each legislative caucus and submit a report of
the nominations to the Legislature for approval. If the Legislature does
not adopt the report by a majority vote of all members, the Committee on
Committees shall prepare another report.
(3) If the number of delegates allocated to represent this state at
the Article V convention is determined by the United States Congress or
by agreement among the states to be a number other than three, the
Legislature shall elect the appropriate number of delegates and alternate
delegates.
(4) The delegates and alternate delegates elected pursuant to this
section shall constitute the Article V Convention Committee. Of the
delegate committee members so elected, the Legislature shall, by a
majority vote of all members, elect a committee chairperson and vice-
chairperson.
(5) Service as a delegate or alternate delegate by a member of the
Legislature is an additional duty of the legislative office.
(6) The Legislature shall pair each alternate delegate with a
delegate at the time of the election. In the event of a vacancy created
by the removal of a delegate or the delegate's absence or incapacity, the
paired alternate delegate shall automatically assume the role of the
paired delegate until such time as the delegate is no longer absent or
-3-

LB259 LB259
2025 2025
incapacitated. If a paired delegate and alternate delegate are both
removed, absent, or incapacitated, the Legislature shall elect a new
delegate and paired alternate delegate.
Sec. 5. (1) Delegates and alternate delegates shall not be
compensated for their service as delegates and alternate delegates.
(2) Delegates and alternate delegates may be reimbursed for their
expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties as provided
in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(3)(a) A delegate or an alternate delegate shall not accept a gift
as defined in section 49-1423 from (i) any person who is required to
register as a lobbyist under the Nebraska Political Accountability and
Disclosure Act, (ii) any person who is required to register as a lobbyist
with any other state, or (iii) any person who is required to register and
file reports of lobbying activities, contributions, and expenses with the
Secretary of the United States Senate or the Clerk of the United States
House of Representatives.
(b) Any person who knowingly and intentionally violates this
subsection is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.
Sec. 6. (1) Each delegate and alternate delegate shall take the
following oath upon election as a delegate or alternate delegate: I do
solemnly swear (or affirm) that, to the best of my abilities, I will, as
a delegate (or alternate delegate) to the Article V convention, act
according to the limits of the authority granted to me as a delegate (or
alternate delegate) under the Faithful Delegate to Federal Article V
Convention Act, will not consider or vote to approve an amendment to the
Constitution of the United States not authorized by the Legislature in
its application to the United States Congress to call this convention or
an amendment outside of the scope of this convention if the Legislature
did not make an application to the United States Congress to call this
convention, and will faithfully abide by and execute the instructions to
the delegates and alternate delegates adopted by the Legislature.
-4-

LB259 LB259
2025 2025
(2) Each delegate and alternate delegate shall file the executed
oath with the Secretary of State.
Sec. 7. (1) At the time delegates and alternate delegates are
elected under the Faithful Delegate to Federal Article V Convention Act,
the Legislature shall adopt instructions for the delegates and alternate
delegates to govern their actions at the Article V convention.
(2) The Legislature shall not adopt instructions for an Article V
convention called following the application by the Legislature to the
United States Congress for the convention that authorize a delegate or
alternate delegate to consider or vote to approve an amendment to the
Constitution of the United States that is not authorized by the
Legislature in its application for the convention.
(3) The Legislature may amend the instructions at any time.
Sec. 8. An alternate delegate shall act in the place of the
alternate delegate's paired delegate in the event of a vacancy created by
the removal of the delegate or the delegate's absence or incapacity. An
alternate delegate acting under this section shall be deemed the delegate
for purposes of such action.
Sec. 9. (1) A delegate shall not cast an unauthorized vote. A vote
determined to be an unauthorized vote is invalid.
(2) The determination that a vote is an unauthorized vote shall only
be made by the Legislature or by the advisory committee created pursuant
to section 11 of this act when the Legislature is not in session.
(3) A delegate who casts a vote determined to be an unauthorized
vote is disqualified to continue to serve as a delegate or alternate
delegate, and the vacancy created by the disqualification shall be filled
as provided in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 10. When it is determined by the Legislature or the advisory
committee created pursuant to section 11 of this act that a delegate has
cast an unauthorized vote, the Speaker of the Legislature shall promptly
notify the Article V Convention Committee chairperson and the presiding
-5-

LB259 LB259
2025 2025
officer of the Article V convention that the delegate has cast an
unauthorized vote and is disqualified to serve as a delegate.
Sec. 11. (1) The Executive Board of the Legislative Council and the
Lieutenant Governor shall serve as the advisory committee for the Article
V Convention Committee. The chairperson of the executive board shall
serve as the chairperson of the advisory committee. If the chairperson or
any other member of the executive board is serving as a delegate or an
alternate delegate, the chairperson's or other board member's position on
the advisory committee shall be deemed vacant and the vacancy shall be
filled in the same manner as a vacancy on the executive board. The
Lieutenant Governor may cast the deciding vote in the event of a tie vote
by the rest of the voting members of the advisory committee.
(2) If the Legislature is not in session at a regular or special
session while an Article V convention is convened, the members of the
advisory committee shall:
(a) Meet at the call of the chairperson at the State Capitol;
(b) Upon the request of a delegate or an alternate delegate, advise
the delegate or alternate delegate whether there is reason to believe
that an action or an attempt to take an action by a delegate or alternate
delegate could result in an unauthorized vote; and
(c) Determine whether a vote cast by a delegate is an unauthorized
vote as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) If a vote cast by a delegate is challenged as an unauthorized
vote under the Faithful Delegate to Federal Article V Convention Act, the
advisory committee shall determine that the vote is an unauthorized vote
only if six or more members of the advisory committee vote that it was an
unauthorized vote.
(4) The advisory committee shall not take any action when the
Legislature is convened in regular or special session.
-6-